dictionaries/km_KH/src/km.aff
SET UTF-8

# BREAK: Define word break characters
# "​" (U+200B Zero Width Space) is an invisible character used as a word boundary marker in Khmer text
# "៕" (U+17D5 Khmer Sign Bariyoosan) - section sign
# "។" (U+17D4 Khmer Sign Khan) - full stop/period
# " " (U+0020 Space) - regular space
BREAK 4
BREAK ​
BREAK ៕
BREAK ។
BREAK  

REP 2
# "្"+"ត" to "្"+"ដ"
REP ្ត ្ដ
# Double zero-width spaces "​​" (U+200B U+200B) to single zero-width space "​" (U+200B)
REP ​​ ​

# Prefix rule for "ទី" (place/location marker)
# ទីកន្លែង
# ទីប្រឹក្សា
# ទីបញ្ជាការ
# ទីរហោស្ថាន
# ទីវាល
# ទីផ្សារ
# ទីក្រុង
PFX T Y 1
PFX T 0 ទី .

# Prefix rule for "ការ" (action/nominalization prefix)
# ការស្លាប់
# ...
PFX G Y 1
PFX G 0 ការ .

# Suffix rule for "ការណ៍" (report/statement suffix)
# ផ្លូវការណ៍
# របាយការណ៍
# ថ្លែងការណ៍
SFX K Y 1
SFX K 0 ការណ៍ .
