dictionaries/km_KH/src/km.dic
កកិល/G
កកេះ/G
កង/G
កង្ខើញ/G
កញ្ឆល/G
កញ្ជ្រោក/G
កណ្ដាស់/G
កន្ដ្រោង/G
កន្លែង/T
កន្សែង/G
កម្ជាប់/G
កម្ទេច/G
កម្សាន្ត/G
កាច់/G
កាត់សាំ/G
ការពារ/G
កាឡា/G
កិប/G
កុក/G
កុហក/G
កួត/G
កើល/G
កៀប/G
កៀស/G
កេះ/G
កែន/G
កោយ/G
កោះ/G
កំដឹង/G
កំហែង/G
ក្ដិច/G
ក្បង់/G
ក្បឺត/G
ក្រង/G
ក្រនៀវ/G
ក្រពាត់ដៃ/G
ក្រវែល/G
ក្រឡក/G
ក្រឡេក/G
ក្រាប/G
ក្រុង/TG
ក្រែង/G
ក្លាត់/G
ក្លៀក/G
ក្វាត/G
កត់/G
ខ/G
ខាត់/G
ខារ/G
ខិតខំ/G
ខួង/G
ខាំ/G
ខ្ចរខ្ចាយ/G
ខ្ចី/G
ខ្ជឹប/G
ខ្ញាំ/G
ខ្ទាត/G
ខ្និច/G
ខ្ពើម/G
ខ្លុះ/G
ខ្វារ/G
ខ្វែង/G
គក់/G
គង់នៅ/G
គន់/G
គប់គិត/G
គរ/G
គាយ/G
គុត/G
គេង/G
គៃ/G
គំនាប់/G
គាំ/G
គះគា/G
គ្រង/G
គ្រប/G
គ្រលុក/G
គ្រលែង/G
គ្រវែង/G
គ្រាក់/G
គ្រៀវ/G
ឃើញ/G
ឃ្លាត/G
ឃ្លោង/G
ឃ្វាល/G
ងាក/G
ងើត/G
ងោក/G
ចងពុង/G
ចចាកអារ៉ាក/G
ចចេស/G
ចម្រាញ់/G
ចម្អិន/G
ចរលីលា/G
ចាក់កន្ទ្រង់/G
ចាញ់/G
ចាប់ចិត្ត/G
ចារចែង/G
ចិត/G
ចឺម/G
ចូក/G
ចៀន/G
ចេរ/G
ចែង/G
ចោទ/G
ចោះ/G
ចំណាយ/G
ចំទួយ/G
ចំហុយ/G
ចំអើត/G
ច្នៃ/G
ច្បោល/G
ច្រក/G
ច្រប់/G
ច្របុច/G
ច្រឡុង/G
ច្រឡោត/G
ច្រាស/G
ច្រឹប/G
ច្រួច/G
ច្រោះ/G
ឆក់/G
ឆាឆៅ/G
ឆាវ/G
ឆុក/G
ឆូត/G
ឆេរ/G
ឆាំង/G
ឆ្កូត/G
ឆ្ងល់/G
ឆ្ពុង/G
ឆ្លក/G
ឆ្លុះ/G
ឆ្វាយ/G
ជង់/G
ជញ្ជក់/G
ជញ្ជាប/G
ជញ្ជួច/G
ជន្ល/G
ជម/G
ជម្រាល/G
ជល់/G
ជិន/G
ជីប/G
ជុះ/G
ជួត/G
ជួសជុល/G
ជៀស/G
ជែង/G
ជោះ/G
ជំរត់/G
ជំលាប/G
ជ្រក/G
ជ្រប/G
ជ្រាម/G
ជ្រួល/G
ជ្រែ/G
ជ្រោមជ្រែង/G
ជម្រេញ/G
ឈរ/G
ឈូស/G
ឈ្នះ/G
ឈ្លក់/G
ឈ្លេច/G
ញញើត/G
ញល់/G
ញ៉ាម/G
ញីញញូញ/G
ញុះ/G
ញើញ/G
ញៀត/G
ញែក/G
ញ៉ាំ/G
ដង្វិន/G
ដដុស/G
ដរធរ/G
ដាច់/G
ដាល/G
ដាស់/G
ដឹកដៀវ/G
ដុកដាន់/G
ដូន/G
ដួស/G
ដើរទេស/G
ដេក/G
ដោយ/G
ដោះដៃ/G
ដំ/G
ដាំ/G
ឌឺដង/G
ណា/T
ណែ/G
តក់ប្រមា/G
តប់/G
តម្កល់/G
តម្រៀប/G
តាង/G
តាយស្មិង/G
តុញ/G
តេន/G
តែម/G
តោងទាម/G
ត្បក/G
ត្បុរ/G
ត្រកង/G
ត្រដរ/G
ត្របាក់/G
ត្របះ/G
ត្រសុល/G
ត្រាប់/G
ត្រុដ/G
ត្រួស/G
ត្រាំ/G
ត្អើក/G
ថមថយ/G
ថាប់/G
ថែ/G
ថៃហ្ល័ង/G
ថ្កាប់/G
ថ្ងូរ/G
ថ្នះ/G
ថ្ពេច/G
ថ្លែង/KG
ថ្លោះ/G
ទង់/G
ទង់ទាញ/G
ទទាក់/G
ទទួល/G
ទន្ទឹង/G
ទប់ទល់/G
ទម្រុឌ/G
ទម្រោប/G
ទម្លាប់/G
ទរ/G
ទ័ល/G
ទាញ/G
ទាយ/G
ទិច/G
ទឹម/G
ទុកបាត្រ/G
ទូទៅ/G
ទើង/G
ទែះ/G
ទំនុកបម្រុង/G
ទាំ/G
ទ្រទូង/G
ទ្រាប/G
ទ្រុស្ដ/G
ទ្រោល/G
ធន់/G
ធុញ/G
ធ្លាក់/G
ធ្លោយ/G
ធ្វេស/G
នាមកិរិយា/G
និយាយ/G
នឿយ/G
នៅ/G
បក/G
បង់ឃ្លាត/G
បង់សំណាញ់/G
បង្កប់/G
បង្កិន/G
បង្កើច/G
បង្កឿង/G
បង្កោង/G
បង្ខន/G
បង្ខិត/G
បង្ខើច/G
បង្ខះ/G
បង្គោះ/G
បង្រាស/G
បង្រួម/G
បង្វឹក/G
បង្វែរ/G
បង្ហប/G
បង្ហាញ/G
បង្ហិល/G
បង្ហួត/G
បង្ហើប/G
បង្ហេវ/G
បង្អក/G
បង្អរ/G
បង្អុរ/G
បង្អួល/G
បង្អៀវ/G
បង្អោន/G
បញ្ចាច់/G
បញ្ចូល/G
បញ្ចេញ/G
បញ្ចាំ/G
បញ្ច្រិច/G
បញ្ឆាច់/G
បញ្ឆឹក/G
បញ្ឆៀង/G
បញ្ជច់/G
បញ្ជាក់/G
បញ្ជាការ/T
បញ្ជាប់ព្រលឹង/G
បញ្ជោក/G
បញ្ជ្រាប/G
បញ្ជ្រួស/G
បញ្ឈែល/G
បណ្ដុន/G
បណ្ដែត/G
បណ្ណែ/G
បន្ត/G
បន្តុះ/G
បន្ថុច/G
បន្ទរ/G
បន្ទាស/G
បន្ទេរ/G
បន្ទុំ/G
បន្ទ្រោម/G
បន្លប់/G
បន្លឹម/G
បន្លែ/G
បន្សាត់/G
បន្សុទ្ធ/G
បន្សះ/G
បបោសអង្អែល/G
បម្រើ/G
បរិភោក្ដា/G
បាត់បង់/G
បិត/G
បីបាច់/G
បុល/G
បូកប៉ាន់/G
បូតសណ្ដែក/G
បួងសួង/G
បៀត!/G
បេះ/G
បែរ/G
បោយ/G
បោះបង់/G
បំបត់/G
បំបាក់/G
បំបួស/G
បំបែរ/G
បំបាំង/G
បំប៉ោង/G
បំប្លែង/G
បំផឹក/G
បំផុល/G
បំផ្លាង/G
បំពក់/G
បំពម/G
បំពួន/G
បំពេញ/G
បំពោរ/G
បំព្រុល/G
បំភិត/G
បំភ្លេច/G
បះ/G
ប៉ប៉ុក/G
ប៉ប្រិច/G
ប៉ាន/G
ប៉ាវ/G
ប៉ឹង/G
ប៉ែង/G
ប្ដូរ/G
ប្រក់ព្រំ/G
ប្រកាប់/G
ប្រកើយ/G
ប្រខង/G
ប្រគរ/G
ប្រចាប់/G
ប្រចុប/G
ប្រចាំ/G
ប្រឈួន/G
ប្រដាល់/G
ប្រដោត/G
ប្រឌិដ្ឋ/G
ប្រតប់/G
ប្រតិស្ន/G
ប្រថុយ/G
ប្រទាក់/G
ប្រទូសរ៉ាយ/G
ប្របិច/G
ប្រពាត/G
ប្រមូល/G
ប្រយុទ្ធ/G
ប្រលែង/G
ប្រវាយ/G
ប្រសា/G
ប្រហួរ/G
ប្រឡាក់/G
ប្រាប/G
ប្រាយ/G
ប្រិតប្រៀង/G
ប្រឹក្សា/T
ប្រុង/G
ប្រើ/G
ប្រែ/G
ប្រះ/G
ប្លុង/G
បញ្ចរ/G
ផាយ/G
ផុស/G
ផែ/G
ផ្កាប់/G
ផ្គូ/G
ផ្ងាក/G
ផ្ងំ/G
ផ្ចាល/G
ផ្ដន្ទា/G
ផ្ដិត/G
ផ្ដៀង/G
ផ្ដែកវេរ/G
ផ្ទប់/G
ផ្ទារ/G
ផ្ទុក/G
ផ្លាញ/G
ផ្លូវ/K
ផ្លែង/G
ផ្សព្វ/G
ផ្សារ/TG
ផ្សំ/G
ផ្សះ/G
ផ្អឹប/G
ផ្អែក/G
ពង/G
ពង្រល/G
ពង្រាង/G
ពង្រាល/G
ពង្រឹត/G
ពង្រេ/G
ពង្វាត/G
ពង្វេះ/G
ព័ទ្ធ/G
ពន្យល់/G
ពន្យឺន/G
ពន្យូយ/G
ពន្លក/G
ពន្លាត់/G
ពន្លុន/G
ពន្លើស/G
ពពាក់/G
ពពូន/G
ពាក់/G
ពានា/G
ពាស/G
ពិត/G
ពិភាល់/G
ពឺត/G
ពូន/G
ពើ/G
ពេញ/G
ពែន/G
ពាំង/G
ព្រនរ/G
ព្រយឺត/G
ព្រលាំង/G
ព្រាយ/G
ព្រឺស/G
ព្រួញ/G
ព្រើស/G
ព្រំ/G
ភាន់/G
ភើច/G
ភ្ងប់/G
ភ្ងំ/G
ភ្ជិត/G
ភ្ជុំ/G
ភ្ញាក់/G
ភ្រុស/G
ភ្លាត់/G
ភ្លូក/G
ភ្លេច/G
ម៏/G
មមើ/G
មាន/G
មឹន/G
មូល/G
មើល/G
មៀម/G
យ៉/G
យន់/G
យាងចុះ/G
យឹតយោង/G
យោនយកកំណើត/G
រ៉/G
រក្ស/G
រង/G
រង្កៀស/G
រង្គោះ/G
រត់/G
របាយ/KG
របោច/G
រមតិ/G
រមិលគុណ/G
រម្ងាប់/G
រម្លស់/G
រម្លុប/G
រម្លំ/G
រលក/G
រលាក់/G
រលាស់/G
រលុប/G
រលើង/G
រវល់/G
រវៃ/G
រសក/G
រសាយ/G
រហិក/G
រហោស្ថាន/T
រឭក/G
រ៉ាត់/G
រាប់/G
រាយ/G
រាល/G
រីក/G
រុក/G
រុល/G
រូស/G
រួយ/G
រើស/G
រៀប/G
រៀល/G
រែង/G
រោទ៍/G
រុំ/G
រំគាយ/G
រំជីរំជា/G
រំជំរំជែង/G
រំភាយ/G
រំលស់/G
រំលុប/G
រំលើង/G
រំលេប/G
រំលំ/G
រំអា/G
រំអែង/G
រាំង/G
លក់/G
លត់/G
លម្ហើយ/G
លម្អិត/G
លស់/G
លាក់/G
លាត/G
លាប់/G
លិច/G
លីលាប់/G
លុង/G
លុប/G
លូកលាន់/G
លួង/G
លើង/G
លៀត/G
លេច/G
លែ/G
លោ/G
លោះ/G
លំហើយ/G
លំអុត/G
លះបង់/G
ល្បក/G
ល្បី/G
វក់/G
វ័ណ្ដ/G
វន្ទីយ៍/G
វ៉ាង/G
វាត/G
វាយ/G
វាល/T
វាស/G
វិច/G
វីវាច/G
វ៉ឺនវ៉ាយ/G
វើត/G
វេច/G
វេះវៀន/G
វ៉ៃ/G
សក/G
សង់/G
សង្កួត/G
សង្គ្រុប/G
សង្រួបសង្រួម/G
សង្ហរ/G
សណ្ដូក/G
សណ្ឋិត/G
សន្ធឹង/G
សន្លប់/G
សព្វ/G
សមព្រមត់/G
សម្កុង/G
សម្ដឹង/G
សម្ភី/G
សម្រប/G
សម្រាន្ត/G
សម្រឹង/G
សម្រុះ/G
សម្រួត/G
សម្រាំង/G
សម្លឹង/G
ស៊យ/G
សរុប/G
សសោះ/G
សាក់/G
សាត់/G
សាប/G
សិក្សា/G
ស៊ី/G
ស៊ីប៉ារេត/G
សុគត/G
សុស/G
សូធ្យ/G
សួ/G
ស៊ើប/G
សៀត/G
សែន/G
សំកុក/G
សំចត/G
សំបូងសង្រូង/G
សំយុង/G
សំឡេះ/G
ស្កប់/G
ស្គាល់/G
ស្ងើច/G
ស្ញុរ/G
ស្ដារ/G
ស្ដោះ/G
ស្ទប់/G
ស្ទាល់/G
ស្ទូច/G
ស្ទះ/G
ស្បើម/G
ស្មាច់/G
ស្មូត/G
ស្រង/G
ស្រងោច/G
ស្រប់/G
ស្រលាញ់/G
ស្រវាស្រទេញ/G
ស្រាញ/G
ស្រាវ/G
ស្រុត/G
ស្រើបស្រាល/G
ស្រែក/G
ស្រោបដណ្តប់/G
ស្លន់/G
ស្លុះ/G
ស្វាន/G
ស្វះពន្លះ/G
ស្អំ/G
ហប់/G
ហា/G
ហាត់ព្យាម/G
ហិត/G
ហ៊‌ីងហ៊ាង/G
ហុត/G
ហ៊ុម/G
ហូត/G
ហួងហែង/G
ហួស/G
ហៀវហោះ/G
ហែហៃ/G
ហោ/G
ហ៊ៅ/G
ហ្ល័កហ្ល័ង/G
អង/G
អង្កុញ/G
អង្គប់/G
អង្រួន/G
អច្ឆាវ័ទ/G
អត/G
អន្ទោកអន្ទោល/G
អប/G
អប់រំ/G
អភិវឌ្ឍ/G
អរ/G
អាក់/G
អាងខ្នាង/G
អាន/G
អាភៀស/G
អាល/G
អឹង/G
អុជអាល/G
អូស/G
អើតអើម/G
អៀន/G
ឱន/G
ឱហាត/G
អំពះ/G
